New Jersey, session 221, S4584.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 7 of P.L.1971, c.437 (C.9:6-8.14) is amended to read as follows: 7. a. Except as provided in subsection b. of this section any person knowingly violating the provisions of [this act] P.L.1971, c.437 (C.9:6-8.8 et seq.) including the failure to report an act of child abuse [having] and who has reasonable cause to believe that an act of child abuse has been committed, is guilty of a [disorderly person] crime of the fourth degree. b.    Any person who knowingly fails to report an act of sexual abuse against a child and who has reasonable cause to believe that an act of sexual abuse has been committed is guilty of a crime of the [fourth] third degree. c.     Any person who knowingly fails to cooperate with an investigation of child abuse or neglect conducted by the Division of Child Protection and Permanency, or any other entity in the Department of Children and Families as may be designated by the Commissioner of Children and Families, is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. (cf: P.L.2019, c.40, s.2) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.